Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 5. Public Trust Companies

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-501.
Formation and organizational instrument.

One (1) or more adult persons may organize a corporation or limited liability company for the purpose of forming a public trust company at a place in this state designated in the organizational instrument subject to the conditions prescribed by law. The organizer shall subscribe and verify triplicate originals of the organizational instrument and the application required under W.S.

13-5-502

and transmit them to the commissioner together with any other documents or information required by rule of the commissioner.

The organizational instrument shall include the following information:

The legal name of the public trust company;

The object for which the public trust company is organized;

The term of its existence which may be perpetual;

The place where its office shall be located and its operations conducted;

The amount of capital stock and the number of shares or the amount of membership interest;

The name and residence of each shareholder subscribing to more than ten percent (10%) of the stock and the number of his shares or the name and residence of each member owning more than ten percent (10%) of the membership interest and percentage of his membership interest;

The number of directors and the names of those who shall manage the affairs of the corporation for the first year or the number and names of managers appointed to manage the affairs of the limited liability company for the first year; and

A statement that the organizational instrument is made to enable the organizer to form a public trust company within this state.

The organizational instrument shall comply with W.S.

17-16-202

for corporations and W.S.

17-29-201

for limited liability companies. The commissioner may establish by rule other documents and materials a public trust company must file.

Copies of all amended organizational instruments shall be filed in the same manner as the original organizational instrument.

This section shall not apply to a foreign corporation or foreign limited liability company that is qualified to do business in this state and that applies for a charter under this article.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 3, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (e).

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-502.
Procedure upon filing of organizational instrument, application and other information.

The organizer shall apply to the commissioner for a charter. The application shall be on forms prescribed by the commissioner and shall contain such information as required by rule of the commissioner.

Upon filing with the commissioner the organizational instrument as required by W.S.

13-5-501

, an application and any other information required by the rules and regulations of the board, the commissioner shall notify the applicants in writing within thirty (30) calendar days of any deficiency in the required information or that the application has been accepted for filing. When the commissioner is satisfied that all required information has been furnished, he shall notify the chairman of the board who shall establish a time and place for a public meeting or hearing if the application is contested which shall be not less than sixty (60) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days after notice from the commissioner that the application is in order. Within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice of the time and place of the public meeting or hearing, the applicant shall cause notice of filing of the application and of the meeting or hearing to be published at the applicant’s expense in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the proposed public trust company is to be located. Publication shall be made at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks before the meeting or hearing stating the proposed location of the public trust company, the names of the proposed applicants for a charter, the nature of the activities to be conducted by the proposed institution and other information as the commissioner shall prescribe by rule. The applicant shall furnish proof of publication to the commissioner not more than ten (10) days prior to the public meeting or hearing.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 102, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

in (b) substituted “time and place” for “time and place within the county where the proposed public trust company is to be located” and “from the commissioner” for “from the state banking commissioner.”

Laws 2020, ch. 102, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-503.
Application filing fee.

The application for a charter filed with the commissioner shall be accompanied by a fee established by rule of the commissioner to cover the expense of the investigation by the commissioner, the expense of the public hearing or meeting and other related expenses. The fee shall be deposited by the commissioner with the state treasurer into the financial institutions administration account. If an application for a public trust company charter is withdrawn by the applicant at any time prior to the meeting or hearing on the application, the application filing fee, less the amount of any expense authorized in this section and actually incurred, shall be refunded to the applicant. If the application is approved and expenses are less than the application fee collected the unexpended amount shall remain within the account.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-504.
Procedure for hearings or meetings on charter applications.

If a party with a bona fide interest contests the charter application, the hearing held shall be a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and shall comply with the requirements of that act. If the application is not contested, a majority of the board members shall hold a public meeting to consider the application. The public meeting shall not be subject to the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-107

through

16-3-112

.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-505.
Emergency charters; fees.

Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this chapter, a public trust company charter may be granted by the commissioner without a public meeting or hearing in any case determined by the commissioner to be an emergency arising from the insolvency, or to prevent the failure, of an existing public trust company. The granting of any emergency charter under this section is contingent upon the commissioner determining that findings required by W.S.

13-5-507

have been satisfied.

The application fee for an emergency charter shall be established by rule of the commissioner. The fee shall be deposited by the commissioner with the state treasurer and credited to the financial institutions administration account.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-506.
Investigation and examination by banking commissioner.

Upon receiving the organizational instrument, application and other information required to be submitted under W.S.

13-5-501

and

13-5-502

, the commissioner shall make a careful investigation and examination of the following:

The character, reputation, financial standing and ability of the organizers and those proposed as directors, managers, members, stockholders or owners of the public trust company;

The character, financial responsibility, trust administration or other financial experience and business qualifications of those proposed as officers or managers; and

Such other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposed public trust company as the commissioner may deem relevant.

The commissioner or his designee shall submit his findings at the public meeting or hearing on the application and shall be subject to cross-examination or questioning by any interested party. No relevant information shall be excluded by the board as hearsay.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-507.
Approval or disapproval of application; criteria for approval; action upon application; interim charter; fee.

Within ninety (90) days after receipt of the transcript of the public meeting or hearing, the board shall in its discretion approve, conditionally approve or disapprove the application, but it shall not approve the application until it has ascertained to its satisfaction:

The proposed public trust company is only being formed for legitimate objects contemplated by the laws of the state;

The proposed capital and surplus are not less than the required minimum established in W.S.

13-5-511

and are adequate in light of current and prospective conditions;

The proposed officers and directors or managers have sufficient experience, ability and professional reputation to afford reasonable promise of successful operation;

The name of the proposed public trust company does not resemble so closely as to cause confusion the name of any other financial institution transacting business in the county; and

The applicants have complied with all applicable provisions of law.

The board shall take action upon the application by stating its findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the board approves the application, the commissioner shall endorse upon the organizational instrument the approval and shall file one (1) copy with the secretary of state, retain one (1) copy in his files and return one (1) copy to the applicants within twenty (20) days after the date of the decision of the board approving the application. If the board conditionally approves an application by requiring increased capital or surplus, retention of additional qualified officers or directors or change of name to avoid confusion, and upon compliance by the applicant, the commissioner shall proceed as provided in the preceding sentence. If the board disapproves the application, the commissioner shall mail notice of the disapproval to the applicants within twenty (20) days after the board’s negative action.

The board may waive the public meeting or hearing required under W.S. 13-5-502(b) if the application is for an interim public trust company charter to be used as a vehicle for merger with an existing public trust company that is currently serving the public need and convenience of the community, operating profitably, adequately capitalized, has officers and directors or managers of proven ability and is to be chartered solely for the purpose of facilitating the merger and the change in ownership of the existing public trust company. The application fee for an interim public trust company charter for which a public meeting or hearing is waived shall be established by rule and regulation of the commissioner. The fee shall be deposited by the commissioner with the state treasurer and credited to the financial institutions administration account.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-508.
Certificate of authority to commence business required; application; approval or denial; failure to commence business.

If the application is approved and a charter granted by the board, the public trust company shall not commence business before receiving a certificate of authority to operate from the commissioner. An application for a certificate of authority shall be made to the commissioner and shall certify that all required capital and surplus have been paid in. The application shall list the address at which the public trust company will operate and shall attach the organizational instrument or all adopted bylaws. The application shall state who the officers, directors and stockholders or the members and managers are at that time. The commissioner shall approve or deny an application for a certificate of authority within thirty (30) days after the application has been filed, but the authority of the commissioner to disapprove any application is restricted solely to noncompliance with this section. If the commissioner approves the application, he shall issue a certificate of authority to the organizers within twenty (20) days. If the commissioner denies the application, he shall mail a notice of denial to the organizers within twenty (20) days, stating the reasons for denying the application, and grant to the organizers a maximum period of ninety (90) days to resubmit the application with the necessary corrections. If the applicant fails to comply with requirements of the notice of denial within ninety (90) days from the receipt of the notice, the approval of the application and charter previously issued to the applying public trust company shall be revoked by the commissioner. The failure of the commissioner to act upon an application for a certificate of authority within thirty (30) days shall be deemed an approval. If the approved public trust company fails to commence business in good faith within one (1) year after the issuance of a certificate of authority by the commissioner or any required federal approval, whichever is later, the charter and certificate of authority shall expire.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-509.
Decisions by board appealable; grounds.

Any decision of the board in approving or disapproving any charter or the issuance or denial of a certificate of authority is appealable to the district court of the county in which the public trust company is to be located in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. In addition to the grounds for appeal contained in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, the appellant may appeal if the board or the commissioner fails to make any of the findings required.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-510.
Powers of public trust companies; limitations; prohibitions; conflicts of interest; exemptions.

Public trust companies may exercise the powers permitted by subsection (b) of this section and the powers and rights granted to other corporations and limited liability companies under general law except as provided by this chapter.

Each public trust company may:

Act or be appointed by any court to act in like manner as an individual or as a fiduciary for any purpose permitted by law;

Act as transfer agent or registrar of corporate stocks and bonds;

Purchase, invest in and sell stocks, bonds, mutual funds, mortgages and other securities for the account of trusts;

Accept and execute any trust company business permitted by any law of this or any other state or of the United States to be taken, accepted or executed by an individual;

Take oaths and execute affidavits by the oath or affidavit of its directors, managers, managing members, officers, agents or employees;

Make any lawful fiduciary investment as permitted by W.S.

2-3-301

;

Do and perform all acts necessary to exercise the powers enumerated in this chapter.

A public trust company shall not engage in any banking business by accepting general deposits or issuing demand instruments.

A public trust company may invest its capital and surplus in stocks, bonds, mortgages, mutual funds and other securities. A public trust company may invest in, purchase, hold, convey and lease real estate in accordance with W.S. 13-3-201(a)(i).

A public trust company shall consider the following when undertaking a transaction or other action authorized under subsection (b) of this section:

The interests of the beneficiaries of the trust for which the public trust company is acting as fiduciary, if applicable;

Whether the transaction or action complies with the terms of the governing instrument establishing the fiduciary relationship, any applicable judgments, judicial decrees or court orders and any applicable consent agreements or releases.

Except as provided in this chapter, no person shall act as a public trust company or engage in trust company business without first obtaining a charter from the commissioner under this chapter.

A bank or savings and loan authorized under the laws of the United States or this state to engage in trust company business in this state, may engage in such business as a bank or savings and loan association without obtaining a charter under this chapter, but shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the administration of its trust accounts.

Insurance companies licensed to write life insurance policies and annuity or endowment contracts in this state and subject to the regulation and control of the state insurance commissioner shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, nothing in this section prohibits a public trust company from transacting business with or investing in any asset of:

A trust, estate, guardianship or conservatorship for which the public trust company is a fiduciary;

Any other company, agent, entity or person for which a conflict of interest may exist.

If a potential conflict of interest exists as to a particular transaction or action between the public trust company in its capacity as a fiduciary and the public trust company in its individual capacity, the transaction or action is not voidable if it complies with this section or occurred before the public trust company entered into the fiduciary relationship.

A transaction by or action of a public trust company is not voidable if:

The transaction or action was authorized by the terms of the organizational instrument;

The transaction or action was approved by a court pursuant to a judgment, judicial decree or court order;

The transaction or action was authorized by a valid consent agreement or release signed by all interested persons to the transaction or action;

No interested person commenced a legal action relating to the transaction in accordance with subsection (n) of this section; or

The transaction or action occurred before the public trust company entered into the fiduciary relationship.

A legal action by an interested person alleging that a transaction or action by a public trust company is voidable because of the existence of a conflict of interest must be commenced within one (1) year of the date on which the interested person discovered, or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have discovered, the facts in support of his claim.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a public trust company is not required to obtain court approval for any transaction that otherwise complies with the provisions of this section.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-511.
Requirements as to capital or membership interest.

The capital stock or membership interest of each public trust company shall be subscribed for as fully paid stock or fully paid membership interests. No public trust company shall organize with a capital stock or membership interest less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00).

No public trust company shall commence business until the full amount of its authorized capital or membership interest is subscribed and fully paid in. No public trust company may organize without a paid up surplus fund of at least twenty percent (20%) of its legally authorized capital stock or membership interest, and undivided profits in sufficient amount for the first year expenses of operation as determined by the commissioner.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-512.
Issue of stock or membership interest.

A public trust company shall not issue any share of stock or any percentage of membership interest until the par value of the share or the capital contribution has been actually paid in cash.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-513.
Increase or reduction of capital stock.

A public trust company may increase or reduce the capital stock or membership interest of the public trust company after receiving the written approval of the commissioner and by the vote of the shareholders or members owning two-thirds (2/3) of the stock or membership interest in the public trust company at a stockholders’ or members’ meeting called for that purpose.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-514.
Transfer of stock, membership interests and other ownership interests.

The shares of stock or membership interests of public trust companies are personal property and shall be transferred on the books of the public trust company in such manner as the bylaws or operating agreement may provide. A transfer of stock or membership interest in a public trust company is invalid until any impairment of its capital stock or membership interest has been restored.

Transfers of voting stock or membership interests of a public trust company shall be reported to the commissioner not less than ten (10) days prior to being made if the transfer:

Equals or exceeds ten percent (10%) of the public trust company’s voting ownership interests; or

Is made to a person owning or controlling ten percent (10%) or more and less than eighty percent (80%) of the public trust company’s voting ownership interests.

The commissioner may disapprove any transfer of stock or membership interest required to be reported if he finds that the transferee:

Has been convicted of a felony; or

Has been removed from a position as director, manager, officer or employee of a public trust company or other financial institution pursuant to an order of the commissioner or federal regulatory authority.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-515.
Stock or membership interest register; inspection.

A public trust company shall keep a stock or membership interest register that is open for inspection during business hours to officers, directors and stockholders or members and managers of the public trust company. The register shall contain the name, residence and number of shares of each stockholder or the percentage of membership interest of each member and all transfers of stock or membership interest, stating the time made, the number of shares or percentage of membership interest transferred and to whom transferred.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-516.
Voting by shareholders and members generally; balloting for directors and managers.

Unless the public trust company’s governing documents provide otherwise:

Each share or membership interest entitles the owner to one (1) vote on all elections of directors or managers and all other questions submitted at meetings of shareholders or members. Shareholders or members may vote by proxies executed in writing but no officer, clerk, teller or bookkeeper of the public trust company shall act as proxy. The presence in person or by proxy of the owners of at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the issued and outstanding capital stock or membership interest at any meeting of stockholders or members constitutes a quorum;

In balloting for directors or managers each qualified shareholder or member may vote the number of shares or amount of membership interest owned by him for as many directors or managers as are to be elected or may cumulate his votes by giving one (1) candidate the number of votes equal to the number of directors or managers to be elected multiplied by the number of his shares or percentage of membership interest and he may distribute his votes cumulatively on the same principle among any number of candidates. The persons having the highest number of votes shall be declared elected as the board of directors or as managers for the ensuing corporate year.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-517.
Preferred stock.

Unless the organizational instrument of a public trust company is more restrictive, a public trust company may issue one (1) or more classes of preferred stock or membership interest upon the approval of two-thirds (2/3) of the stockholders or members and the approval of the commissioner under this section.

Copies of the directors’ and stockholders’ or members’ and managers’ minutes approving the issuance and bearing the approval of the commissioner shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and treated as an amendment to the organizational instrument.

At a board of directors’ or managers’ meeting called on not less than one (1) day’s notice, the directors or managers may adopt a resolution calling for the issuance of preferred shares or classes of membership interest. The directors shall then call a meeting of the stockholders or members, giving not less than five (5) days’ notice and stating the purpose of the meeting.

The voting rights and manner of retirement of preferred shares or membership interest shall be as adopted in the resolution of the stockholders or members authorizing their issuance subject to the provisions of the organizational instrument and the approval of the commissioner.

The holders of the preferred stock or membership interest of the highest class shall be entitled to cumulative dividends or distributions of up to six percent (6%) per year before dividends are paid on any other stock or before distributions are made to members of any other class. The holders of preferred stock or membership interest of subsequent classes shall next be entitled to cumulative dividends or distributions of up to six percent (6%) in order of preference before dividends are paid to the holders of common stock or before distributions are made to members of any other class. In any liquidation no payment shall be made to the holders of common stock or membership interest until the holders of preferred stock or highest priority membership interest have been paid the full par value of their stock and accumulated dividends or the full value, up to the amount of their capital contribution and accumulated profits, in order of preference.

The preferred stock and holders of preferred stock and preferred membership interest and the owners of preferred membership interest are not liable for assessments to restore impairment of capital or for any liability imposed by law on common stock or the holders of common stock or on the lowest priority membership class or the owners of the lowest priority of membership interest.

No issue of preferred stock or membership interest is valid until the entire par value of the shares or membership interest has been paid in cash or until arrangements satisfactory to the commissioner have been made for payment.

The par value of preferred stock or membership interest shall be included in any determination of required capital under this chapter.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-518.
Authority to manage public trust companies; qualifications.

The affairs of a public trust company shall be managed by not less than five (5) directors or managers. Shareholders or the board of directors or members or the managers, if provided by the organizational instrument, may adopt and amend bylaws for the management of the public trust company. Each director and manager shall take an oath that he will faithfully and diligently perform the duties of his office and will not violate or knowingly permit the violation of any of the laws of this state relating to trust company business. Within thirty (30) days after being elected or appointed each director and manager of a public trust company shall sign the oath required by this section on a form prescribed by the commissioner and it shall be part of the record of any meeting and included in the public trust company’s minutes. Within thirty (30) days after initially being elected or appointed each director and manager of a public trust company shall file with the commissioner a sworn financial statement on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-519.
Election; term; vacancies; number.

The initial and elected directors or managers of any public trust company shall hold office for one (1) year and until their successors are elected and qualified except in cases of death, resignation or removal under the laws of this state. All elections shall be held annually on a day designated by the directors or managers on or before April 30.

If the annual election of directors or managers is not held at the time designated, an election may be held within sixty (60) days thereafter following notice by publication in three (3) consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper printed in the county in which the public trust company is located, or if no newspaper is printed in the county then in a newspaper of general circulation in the state.

Any director or manager who during his tenure as a director becomes insolvent or makes a general assignment of his property for the benefit of creditors shall vacate his office.

Vacancies which reduce the board or the total number of managers to less than five (5) members shall be filled within ninety (90) days of the vacancy by appointment by the remaining directors or managers for the unexpired term. The board or managers shall notify the commissioner of any vacancy on the board or of any manager within thirty (30) days of the vacancy.

Changes in the number of directors or managers shall be authorized by a majority vote of the stockholders or members to be effective upon expiration of the current corporate year. The change may become effective immediately with the consent of the directors or managers and written notification to the commissioner.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-520.
Meetings; record of proceedings and business.

The board of directors or managers of a public trust company shall hold a regular meeting at least once every quarter of the calendar year. At each meeting a detailed report showing all trust business shall be submitted. The board of directors or managers shall review the report and make it a part of the record of the meeting. The record shall show their approval or disapproval of the report.

A record of the proceedings and business of all meetings shall be included in the public trust company’s minutes.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-521.
Inspection of public trust company; confidentiality.

Every public trust company is subject to inspection by the commissioner. The commissioner or a duly appointed examiner shall visit and examine each public trust company as often as the commissioner deems necessary and at least once every two (2) years, with or without previous notice to the officers or managers of or anyone interested in the public trust company. The commissioner or a duly appointed examiner shall make a complete and careful examination of the condition and resources of the public trust company, the mode of managing the company’s affairs and conducting its business, all records, transactions and other data or documents pertaining to the actions of the public trust company, the action of its officers and directors or managers in the investment and disposition of trust funds, the safety and prudence of the company’s management, the security afforded to those by whom trust company engagements are held, whether the requirements of this chapter are being complied with and such other matters as the commissioner may prescribe.

All information, reports or applications obtained by the commissioner from an applicant or public trust company are confidential.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-522.
Conversion from chartered family trust company to public trust company.

A chartered family trust company that complies with the requirements outlined in W.S.

13-5-501

through

13-5-509

, and upon approval of the new public trust company charter and surrender of the chartered family trust company charter, may be granted a charter as a public trust company.

History.

Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-218

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote this section, which read: "A chartered family trust company following the procedure outlined in W.S.

13-5-102

through W.S.

13-5-105

, and upon approval of the new charter and surrender of the family trust company charter, may be granted a charter as a trust company."